Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-601
Emergency Firefighting Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Emergency Firefighting Fund, to be used by the State Fire Marshal to assist in controlling and extinguishing wildland fires. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1965, c. 190, § 1, p. 581;

Laws 1969, c. 286, § 1, p. 1055;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 37, p. 2366;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 31.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.